Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska31-743
District; septic tanks; discontinue use; when.

Whenever a sewer system has been established, and dwellings in the district shall connect therewith, all septic tanks shall be dispensed with. The board of trustees or the administrator shall have the authority to institute court proceedings in a court of competent jurisdiction to carry out the provisions of this section.

Laws 1949, c. 78, § 17, p. 202;

Laws 1982, LB 868, § 11.